test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_paaccid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - pääcciđ: # MLO, checked
    pääcciđ+V+Inf: pääcciđ
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páásám
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: páásáh
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: páácá
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: päcceen
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: päcivettee
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pääcciv
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pääccip
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: päcivetteđ
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pääcih

    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: paaccim
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: paaccih
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: paasij
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: passijm
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: passijd
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: passijn
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: paasijm
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: paasijd
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: paccii

    pääcciđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pásáččim
    pääcciđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: pásáččih
    pääcciđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pásáččij
    pääcciđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: pásáččáim
    pääcciđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: pásáččáid
    pääcciđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: pásáččáin
    pääcciđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: pásáččijm
    pääcciđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: pásáččijd
    pääcciđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: pásáččii

    pääcciđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pässeem
    pääcciđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: pässeeh
    pääcciđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: paasiš
    pääcciđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: pasižeen
    pääcciđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: paasišvettee
    pääcciđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: pasižává
    pääcciđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: pasižep
    pääcciđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: paasišvetteđ
    pääcciđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: pasižeh

    pääcciđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pääsi
    pääcciđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: páásus
    pääcciđ+V+Imprt+Du1: päccoon
    pääcciđ+V+Imprt+Du2: päccee
    pääcciđ+V+Imprt+Du3: pááccus
    pääcciđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pááccup
    pääcciđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pääcciđ
    pääcciđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pááccus
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pääsi
    pääcciđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pááccám
    pääcciđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: pásáččii
    pääcciđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: paasii
    pääcciđ+V+PrsPrc: päccee
    pääcciđ+V+PrfPrc: pááccám
    pääcciđ+V+Actio+Nom: pääccim
    pääcciđ+V+Actio+Ess: päcimin
    pääcciđ+V+Actio+Loc: päcimist
    pääcciđ+V+Actio+Ill: päcimân
    pääcciđ+V+Actio+Com: päsidijn
    pääcciđ+V+VAbess: päsihánnáá
